Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-959
Separate budget programs required.

The budget division of the Department of Administrative Services shall administratively create a separate budget program classification within the Department of Correctional Services to properly account for revenue and disbursements of items stocked and sold by the central warehouse system. The Department of Correctional Services shall track the operating expenses of the central warehouse system within a separate budget subprogram within the central office budget.

Laws 1999, LB 873, § 10.